Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1611
Conference; employee; decision to terminate service; when.

The employee of the utility shall, based solely on the evidence presented at the conference, affirm, reverse, or modify any decision by the utility involving a disputed bill which results in a threatened termination of utility service. The employee shall allow termination of utility service only as a measure of last resort after the utility has exhausted all other remedies less drastic than termination.

Laws 1979, LB 143, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 19-2710;

Laws 1988, LB 792, § 11.